Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.260

Tax Reform Act of 1969, state implementation—Severability—RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260.

If any provision of RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 or the application thereof to any trust is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 are declared to be severable.

[ 1985 c 30 s 135. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 168; 1971 c 58 s 7. Formerly RCW 19.10.260.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.